Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 52

Accounting

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

28-52-101. Liability of personal representative.

Property of the Estate.A personal representative shall be liable for and chargeable in his or her accounts with all of the estate of the decedent which, at any time, comes into his or her possession, including income therefrom. However, he or she shall not be:

Accountable for any debts due the decedent or other assets of the estate which, without his or her fault, remain uncollected;

Entitled to any profit by the increase of the estate or value thereof; and

Chargeable for any loss of, damage to, or decrease in value of the estate which occurs without his or her fault.

Property Not a Part of Estate.A personal representative shall be chargeable in his or her accounts with property not a part of the estate which comes into his or her hands at any time and shall be liable to the persons entitled to that property, if:

The property was received under a duty imposed on him or her by law in the capacity of personal representative; or

He or she has commingled the property with the assets of the estate.

Breach of Duty.A personal representative shall be liable and chargeable in his or her accounts for loss resulting from:

Neglect or unreasonable delay in collecting the assets of the estate;

Neglect or unreasonable delay in any sale, mortgage, or lease of the property of the estate which has been ordered by the court;

Neglect or unreasonable delay in paying over money or delivering property of the estate which is in his or her hands;

Embezzlement or commingling of the assets of the estate with other property;

Self dealing;

The wrongful acts or omissions of his or her corepresentative which he or she could have prevented by the exercise of ordinary care; or

Any other neglect or willful act in his or her administration of the estate.

When Not Personally Liable.A personal representative shall not be made liable in his or her individual capacity on account of any action brought or judgment rendered against him or her in his or her capacity as personal representative, nor shall a personal representative, as such, be made liable on account of a judgment rendered against him or her in his or her fiduciary capacity for an amount more than the assets of the estate which are applicable to the payment of the judgment.

The creditors of an estate were held represented by the administrator and will be concluded by a judgment against him touching the disposition of the estate. W.R. Moore & Co. v. Sloan, 71 Ark. 599, 76 S.W. 1058 (1903).

Under Arkansas' administration system, an executor de son tort was held unknown; it was inconsistent with the policy of the law of administration to hold that any one could make himself the executor of another, and where one intermeddled with the estate of a deceased person, he was responsible to the rightful executor or administrator and not to a creditor. Barasien v. Odum, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 122 (1856); Rust v. Witherington, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 129 (1856) (decisions under prior law).

Dual service as personal representative and accountant does not per se create a conflict of interest. Warren v. Tuminello, 49 Ark. App. 126, 898 S.W.2d 60 (1995).

Where legatees' petition to reopen administration alleged that the administrator was not legally appointed, that she did not qualify for letters testamentary, although the will was admitted to probate, that they received no notice of the filing of accounting or hearing thereon, and that the administrator, who claimed all of the proceeds of the estate, had a personal interest which conflicted with her official duties, these facts were sufficient to require the taking of proof. Holt v. Moody, 234 Ark. 245, 352 S.W.2d 87 (1961).

Cited: Alexander v. First Nat'l Bank, 278 Ark. 406, 646 S.W.2d 684 (1983).

Where a decedent's will instructed the executors to distribute payments to children leaving a specified children's home until the funds of the estate were depleted or until the estate was closed in accordance with laws regarding number of years an estate could remain open, the provision of the will was in harmony with this section. Bakos v. Kryder, 260 Ark. 621, 543 S.W.2d 216 (1976).

Where a plaintiff promptly objected to the “first and final report” filed by an administrator, there was no estoppel of the plaintiff because his present pleading was not timely filed, as it was the duty of the administrator to close the estate, and plaintiff, as an interested person, could ask that the personal representative be cited to show cause why the estate could not be closed. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

Upon filing a petition for final settlement;

Upon the revocation of his or her letters;

Upon his or her application to resign and before his or her resignation is accepted by the court;

Annually during the period of administration unless the court otherwise directs; and

At any other time when directed by the court either of its own motion or on the application of an interested person.

Upon petition of the successor of the deceased or incompetent personal representative, the court shall compel the personal representative or guardian to render an account of the administration of the estate of the decedent, and the court shall settle the account as in other cases.

A surety on the bond of a personal representative may file an account on behalf of his or her principal when the principal, or his or her personal representative or guardian, if he or she is deceased or incompetent, is in default in the filing of such an account.

Cross References. Accounting when no known heirs, §28-13-104.

Statute speaks in terms of the personal representative's duty to file accountings and possible sanctions for failing to do so, and the trustee was not acting as the personal representative when it filed its first accounting that was deemed improper; because the statute did not apply to this case, there was no authority for the probate court's award of attorney's fees to the heirs.U.S. Trust v. First Nat'l Bank & Trust (In re Estate of Kemp), 2014 Ark. App. 160, 433 S.W.3d 911 (2014).

In an estate dispute where a sister sued her brother, who had held a power of attorney for the father, this section did not apply to the sister's argument concerning an accounting that the court had directed the brother to file. This section governs accountings filed during the probate of a decedent's estate but this case was not the probate of the father's estate; the probate court handling the estate was the proper forum for the proceeding on the accounting.Ellis v. Thompson, 2019 Ark. App. 579, 590 S.W.3d 774 (2019).

In his settlement, an administrator was not accountable for waste, whatever his liability therefor may have been otherwise. Reynolds v. Canal & Banking Co., 30 Ark. 520 (1875) (decision under prior law).

An administrator operating a decedent's business was liable for the profits. Mayo v. Arkansas Valley Trust Co., 132 Ark. 64, 200 S.W. 505 (1917) (decision under prior law).

Although this section provides that a probate court may compel an administrator to discharge his or her lawful duties, the statute does not provide for the closing of an estate independent of affirmative action by a probate court. Skaggs v. Cullipher, 57 Ark. App. 50, 941 S.W.2d 443 (1997).

It was the duty of an administrator to report promptly to the probate court all collections made on debts due his intestate; and when he held money so received for a considerable time without reporting it, he should have been charged with interest from the date of collection. Dyer v. Jacoway, 50 Ark. 217, 6 S.W. 902 (1888) (decision under prior law).

Section28-49-110 requires the filing of an inventory in a prescribed form, and this section and §28-52-104 also set out requirements as to form and time to accounting in mandatory terms; the fact that an administrator files a “first and final report” purporting to furnish full information with respect to everything pertaining to an estate is not compliance in the manner and form required by these sections. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

An administrator was not entitled to credit for expenses incurred in regard to a mortgaged farm belonging to an intestate in another state. Kyle v. Ribelin, 188 Ark. 264, 65 S.W.2d 46 (1933) (decision under prior law).

An executor was not entitled to a credit in the annual settlement of his accounts for payments, without an order of the court, to legatees or distributees; such payments were at the peril of the executor and, though valid as between him and the legatee or distributee, were not so as to others having paramount rights in the estate. McPaxton v. Dickson, 15 Ark. (2 Barber) 41 (1854) (decision under prior law).

The former settlement of a deceased administrator was prima facie evidence of amount due by him. Wilson v. Hinton, 63 Ark. 145, 38 S.W. 338 (1896) (decision under prior law).

The failure of an administrator to comply literally with requirements of former statute requiring the filing of vouchers was not sufficient to show fraud in allowing and paying claims. Walls v. Phillips, 204 Ark. 365, 162 S.W.2d 59 (1942) (decision under prior law).

The failure of an executor or administrator to present his account annually for settlement, as prescribed by former similar statute, was a breach of the condition of his bond, for which any person interested in the estate could have maintained an action. Scarborough v. State, 24 Ark. (11 Barber) 20 (1862) (decision under prior law).

When an administrator failed to file an account, he should have been cited and required to file one. Kenyon v. Gregory, 127 Ark. 525, 192 S.W. 887 (1917) (decision under prior law).

Sanction levied against a lawyer, as personal representative of an estate, was proper under subdivision (c)(2) of this section because he failed to timely produce an accounting as ordered by the probate court.Hartsfield v. Lescher, 104 Ark. App. 1, 289 S.W.3d 123 (2008).

If an executor or administrator claimed credit in his settlement with the probate court for an illegal expenditure, the court should have rejected it, although it could have previously approved the expenditure and authorized him to take credit for it. Burke v. Coolidge, 35 Ark. 180 (1879) (decision under prior law).

Where a plaintiff promptly objected to the “first and final report” filed by an administrator, there was no estoppel of the plaintiff because his present pleading was not timely filed, as it was the duty of the administrator to close the estate, and plaintiff, as an interested person, could ask that the personal representative be cited to show cause why the estate could not be closed. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

Where the final settlement of the original administrator had not been approved, an administrator in succession could have sued the original administrator for an accounting, although an intervening administrator had made a final settlement and had been discharged. England Loan Co. v. Campbell, 183 Ark. 49, 35 S.W.2d 75 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Where there were two executors, both were equally responsible, and the probate court should have required joint action in its management, allowance, and payment of claims and settlements. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 937, 160 S.W.2d 194 (1942) (decision under prior law).

A probate court acquired jurisdiction of the person of an administrator for settlement of accounts by the service of a citation and an order of attachment upon him. George v. Elms, 46 Ark. 260 (1885) (decision under prior law).

Where an administrator paid the debts of an estate with his own funds, but at less than their face value, he could not charge the estate with the full amount of the debt, since the administrator would not be permitted to profit from his trust. Trimble v. James, 40 Ark. 393 (1883); Wolf v. Banks, 41 Ark. 104 (1883) (decisions under prior law).

In suit by an heir to recover for overcharges against an estate, it was proper to credit against the overcharges the debts of the estate assumed by the administrator which he was not legally bound to assume. Trimble v. James, 40 Ark. 393 (1883) (decision under prior law).

The requirement of former similar statute could be waived by agreement by all the heirs and distributees. Herndon v. Adkisson, 208 Ark. 106, 184 S.W.2d 953 (1945) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Roberson v. Hamilton, 240 Ark. 898, 405 S.W.2d 253 (1966); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

(1)If a personal representative fails to present his or her account for settlement when due, it shall be the duty of the clerk to issue a citation in any county in the state where the delinquent personal representative may reside or be found, requiring him or her to present his or her account for settlement within thirty (30) days and to show cause why an attachment shall not be issued against him or her for not having presented his or her account according to law.

Accounts rendered by a personal representative shall:

Charges against the personal representative which shall include the property according to the inventory or the balance of it according to the last prior account, all income and property received, and any gains from the sale, conveyance, or other disposition of any property not shown by a prior account;

Credits to which the personal representative is entitled other than payments to distributees;

Assets paid or delivered to distributees;

The balance on hand at the time of settlement and a description of the assets constituting the balance; and

The unpaid liabilities of the estate.

The court may require the account to be made more definite and certain in any respect and may provide for the inspection or verification of the balance of assets on hand.

(1)In all cases in which the personal representative is sole distributee of the estate or in which all of the distributees who are competent and the duly appointed guardians of all incompetent distributees have filed their written waiver of the requirement of the accounting, a formal accounting as required in the preceding portions of this section need not be filed, and it shall be sufficient if the personal representative files a verified statement setting forth the following:

That notice to creditors has been published as required by law and the time for filing claims against the estate has expired;

That there are no unpaid claims;

That all state and federal estate taxes have been paid and a copy of the federal estate tax return which has been filed has been made available to all the distributees ultimately required to bear a portion of the tax, or to their guardian; and

That distribution has been made in full to all persons entitled as distributees of the estate.

However, if any person asserting a claim against the estate or claiming any interest therein which would entitle the person to formal accounting shall file written demand, the personal representative shall comply with the provisions of this section as to formal accounting as in ordinary cases, unless it shall be shown to the court that the alleged claim is invalid or has been paid, or that the person alleging the interest in the estate has in fact no interest therein entitling the person to an accounting.

Where a file folder containing copies of paid bills and receipts was offered after a hearing on an accounting had been completed, and income tax returns, to which the administrator accorded great significance, were not in any way referred to in her “accounting of personal representative” and in such returns deductions for depreciation on improvements on the property and on items of personal property and other items were shown in a lump sum, the accounting was deficient under the provisions of this section. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Cited: Roberson v. Hamilton, 240 Ark. 898, 405 S.W.2d 253 (1966).

At the time of filing an account, the personal representative shall petition the court to settle and allow his or her account.

If the estate is in a proper condition to be closed, he or she shall also petition the court for an order authorizing him or her to distribute the estate and shall specify in the petition the persons to whom distribution is to be made and the proportions or parts of the estate to which each is entitled, or he or she may petition the court to approve a distribution already made.

Cited: Roberson v. Hamilton, 240 Ark. 898, 405 S.W.2d 253 (1966).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 147; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2801.

28-52-102. Duty to close estate.

A personal representative shall close the estate as promptly as practicable.

Upon petition of an interested person, the court may cite the personal representative to show cause why an estate should not be closed.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 148; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2802.

28-52-103. Filing of accounts.

A personal representative must file with the court a verified account of his or her administration:

(1)(A)If the personal representative dies or becomes incompetent, his or her account may be presented by his or her personal representative or the guardian of his or her estate to, and may be settled by, the court in which the estate of which he or she was personal representative is being administered.

The court shall have power to issue attachments and all other process necessary to compel the settlement of accounts by personal representatives, to enforce the judgments and orders of the court, and may assess against the personal representative any costs incurred by reason of his or her neglect of duty.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 149, 158, 159; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2803, 62-2812, 62-2813.

28-52-104. Form of accounts.

Cover a period distinctly stated;

Be accompanied by proper vouchers; and

Contain, separately listed, the following information:

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 150; 1967, No. 287, § 15; 1975, No. 620, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2804.

28-52-105. Petitions for settlement and distribution.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 151; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2805.

28-52-106. Notice of filing of accounts.

During the first week of each month the clerk shall publish, in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the county, a notice of estates in which accounts have been filed by personal representatives during the preceding month, listing in alphabetical order the names of the estates, with the names of the personal representatives thereof and the respective dates of the filing of the accounts, and calling on interested persons to file objections to the accounts on or before the sixtieth day following the filing of the respective accounts, failing which the persons will be barred forever from excepting to the account.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 152; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2806.

28-52-107. Continuance — Hearing — Objections.

Every account filed by a personal representative shall be continued without being acted on for a period of sixty (60) days from the date of its filing.

The court may, and upon motion of an interested person shall, set the hearing on the account for a day certain.

At any time prior to the hearing on an account of a personal representative, an interested person may file written objections to any item or omission in the account.

All objections shall be specific and shall indicate the modification desired.

A bill to open settlements of an executor, charging in general terms that he fraudulently omitted to account for all property mentioned in the inventory, was not sufficiently specific; rather, the facts and circumstances had to be stated with distinctness and precision. Ringgold v. Stone, 20 Ark. (7 Barber) 526 (1859) (decision under prior law).

In a case where several trust beneficiaries filed no objections to an accounting, and a probate court made no ruling on their claims, an appellate court was unable to review any issues they presented on appeal. The claims of the beneficiaries who objected and obtained a ruling on their issues were reviewed.In re Estates of McKnight v. Bank of Am., N.A., 372 Ark. 376, 277 S.W.3d 173 (2008).

The approval by a probate court of an administrator's settlement was conclusive of the accuracy of every item thereof as against creditors who appeared and contested the settlement, unless they showed facts constituting fraud, which have, with no want of diligence on their part, only come to their knowledge since the approval. Edrington v. Jefferson, 53 Ark. 545, 14 S.W. 99 (1890) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court confirming an administrator's settlement was a judgment binding on all persons interested in an estate and conclusive of all matters embraced in such settlement and within the scope of the proceedings. Beckett v. Whittington, 92 Ark. 230, 122 S.W. 633 (1909) (decision under prior law).

The confirmation of a settlement was not conclusive when an appeal was taken. Stricklin v. Galloway, 99 Ark. 56, 137 S.W. 804 (1911) (decision under prior law).

An allowance in favor of an administrator of a claim barred by limitation would not, unless obtained by fraud, accident, or mistake, be set aside in chancery. Dyer v. Jacoway, 50 Ark. 217, 6 S.W. 902 (1888) (decision under prior law).

When exceptions to account of administrator were filed, it was the duty of a court to consider them as long as account-current was before the court for confirmation, and such exceptions did not have to be repeated at each term of court. Himes v. Sharp, 123 Ark. 61, 184 S.W. 431 (1916) (decision under prior law).

The adjudication of a probate court in confirmation of settlement of executors and administrators had to be regarded as a judgment of a court and was binding and conclusive except for fraud, the only mode of correcting mere errors being by appeal. Ringgold v. Stone, 20 Ark. (7 Barber) 526 (1859) (decision under prior law).

If a probate court should have erroneously determined exceptions to an executor's settlement, an appeal would have been to the Supreme Court for a trial de novo, but prohibition would not lie. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 937, 160 S.W.2d 194 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Chancery courts could correct any fraud in the settlements of executors and administrators, and when that was done, if there was a necessity for further proceedings, they should have been had in the probate court. Reinhardt v. Gartrell, 33 Ark. 727 (1878) (decision under prior law).

A court of equity had the power to vacate allowances to administrators obtained by fraud, accident, or mistake in their settlements in a probate court, but none to correct mere errors in allowances. Jones v. Graham, 36 Ark. 383 (1880); Greely Burnham Grocery Co. v. Graves, 43 Ark. 171 (1884) (decisions under prior law).

The jurisdiction of a chancery court was limited to the review of items in the settlement specifically charged to be fraudulent, but this jurisdiction could be enlarged by consent to the parties to include any and all frauds without regard to the specific allegations in the complaint. McLeod v. Griffis, 45 Ark. 505 (1885) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no power to relieve against the fraud of an administrator in buying in the lands of the estate at the sale, as equity alone could grant relief. Hankins v. Layne, 48 Ark. 544, 3 S.W. 821 (1887) (decision under prior law).

A settlement based upon an erroneous calculation, though innocently made, would have been set aside as fraudulent. Dyer v. Jacoway, 50 Ark. 217, 6 S.W. 902 (1888) (decision under prior law).

The discharge of an administrator by a probate court was only for so much of the funds belonging to the estate as was found by his settlement to be in his hands; he would still have been liable for funds received and not accounted for. West v. Waddill, 33 Ark. 575 (1878) (decision under prior law).

If an administrator charged himself in settlement with the appraised value of an estate, while the sale bill returned by him showed the amount for which the property sold exceeded its appraised value, or if he applied the money of the estate to the purchase of property in his own name, the court of chancery would open the settlement for fraud. Osborne v. Graham, 30 Ark. 66 (1875) (decision under prior law).

Although an administrator's credits might have been fraudulent in law, if there was no actual fraud, there was no relief in equity unless there had been injury also. Trimble v. James, 40 Ark. 393 (1883) (decision under prior law).

It was fraud in an administrator to obtain an allowance for himself for the whole of a claim assigned to him when his assignor was indebted to the estate without deducting the debt. Sorrels v. Trantham, 48 Ark. 386, 3 S.W. 198, 4 S.W. 281 (1887) (decision under prior law).

Mere illegal allowances to an administrator, not obtained by misrepresentation or deception upon the court, were not grounds for impeaching or setting aside a settlement in equity; rather, the remedy was by appeal. Mock v. Pleasants, 34 Ark. 63 (1879) (decision under prior law).

The final settlement of executors with a probate court was a record which could not be impeached in a collateral proceeding, but only by a direct proceeding in chancery for fraud. Dooley v. Dooley, 14 Ark. 122 (1853); Stone v. Stillwell, 23 Ark. (10 Barber) 444 (1861) (decisions under prior law).

The purchase by an administrator of his intestate's lands at the administrator's sale through an agent was fraudulent, though not void, but could be avoided by any one interested. McGaughey v. Brown, 46 Ark. 25 (1885) (decision under prior law).

When an administrator became interested in a sale by her as the administrator of lands to pay debts, after the sale but before confirmation, the sale was voidable at instance of the heirs without showing actual fraud. Gibson v. Herriott, 55 Ark. 85, 17 S.W. 589 (1891); Bland v. Fleeman, 58 Ark. 84, 23 S.W. 4 (1893) (decisions under prior law).

An order of a probate court overruling an executor's motion to quash exceptions to his settlement, indicating that court would not try questions of disputed title to realty but would continue hearing on executor's report until those questions were determined in the proper forum, did not justify assumption that probate court would exceed its jurisdiction in the matter so as to authorize granting of a writ of prohibition. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 937, 160 S.W.2d 194 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Where the account of an administrator showing that nothing was due from him to an estate was confirmed by the probate court, no exceptions having been filed, no liability rested on the sureties on the administrator's bond unless the settlement was impeached in equity. Crouch v. Edwards, 52 Ark. 499, 12 S.W. 1070 (1889) (decision under prior law).

The statute of limitations would commence against an action for the frauds of an administrator from the time of his discharge by the probate court. McGaughey v. Brown, 46 Ark. 25 (1885) (decision under prior law).

Fraud would not suspend statute of limitations unless concealed from plaintiff, and then the statute would run from the time of the knowledge of the fraud. McGaughey v. Brown, 46 Ark. 25 (1885); French v. Watson, 52 Ark. 168, 12 S.W. 328 (1889) (decisions under prior law).

The statute of limitations in an action to vacate a settlement for fraud did not run against a distributee who died in infancy until an administrator was appointed on his estate. Sorrels v. Trantham, 48 Ark. 386, 3 S.W. 198, 4 S.W. 281 (1887) (decision under prior law).

Because the minor's estate failed to file objections to the bank's accounting with the probate court, subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section, it could not object to the accounting before the Arkansas Supreme Court; the probate court was not afforded the opportunity to consider any exceptions to the accounting made on the minor's behalf.Estate of McKnight v. Bank of Am., N.A., 372 Ark. 456, 277 S.W.3d 179 (2008).

Where the administrator of brother's estate did not file report and settlement until death of mother, who was the sole heir, other brothers, having an interest in the mother's estate who has succeeded to the whole estate of her deceased son, were entitled to file exception. Carter v. Carter, 193 Ark. 894, 103 S.W.2d 938 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Persons under disabilities were not bound by their failure to except to administrators' settlements and would be heard after their disabilities were removed to make out a case of fraud to their prejudice. Riley v. Norman, 39 Ark. 158 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The suppression of assets by an executor or administrator was sufficient ground for surcharging his account after the administration was closed. Edrington v. Jefferson, 53 Ark. 545, 14 S.W. 99 (1890) (decision under prior law).

The court shall examine the account as restated at a hearing held after notice of the hearing given to the personal representative and other persons, if any, as the court may direct.

After the hearing the court may approve, modify, or disapprove the account as restated.

Cited: Winters v. Winters, 24 Ark. App. 29, 747 S.W.2d 583 (1988).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 153, 154; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2807, 62-2808.

28-52-108. Reference to auditor.

In its discretion, the court may refer an account to an auditor for examination and restatement.

The auditor shall be governed by the law which applies to a master in circuit court for the examination and restatement of an account.

Upon restatement of the account, the auditor shall file it with the court.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 155; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2809.

28-52-109. Order settling account.

Upon the approval of the account of a personal representative, the personal representative and his or her sureties, subject to the right of appeal and to the power of the court to vacate its final orders, shall be relieved from liability for the administration of his or her trust during the accounting period, including the investment of the assets of the estate.

The court may disapprove the account in whole or in part and surcharge the personal representative for any loss caused by any breach of duty.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 156; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2810.

28-52-110. Supplemental account.

Receipts and disbursements by the personal representative subsequent to the filing of his or her final accounts shall be reported to the court for approval and may be incorporated in the report of final distribution.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 157; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2811.